Virginia statutes. Title 40.1. Labor and Employment.
Article 2. Hobby and Model Boilers.

§ 40.1-51.19:1.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Hobby boiler”
means any boiler used solely for demonstration, exhibition, ceremonial or educational purposes, including but not limited to, historical artifacts such as portable and stationary show boilers, farm traction engines, and locomotives.

“Model boiler”
means any boiler fabricated to demonstrate an original design or to reproduce or replicate a historic artifact, and used primarily for demonstration, exhibition, or educational purposes.

History.

1999, c. 335; 2000, c. 898.

Editor’s note.

The 2000 amendment by c. 898 substituted “Hobby” for “Antique” in the Article heading.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 898 substituted “Hobby” for “Antique” in the paragraph defining “Hobby boiler.”

§ 40.1-51.19:2.
Applicability.

Hobby and model boilers may continue in operation but shall be in compliance with the provisions of this article by July 1, 2000.

History.

1999, c. 335; 2000, c. 898.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 898 substituted “Hobby” for “Antique” in the introductory language.

§ 40.1-51.19:3.
Inspection and testing.

A hobby or model boiler shall be inspected every two years inclusive. It shall be the duty of the owner of any hobby or model boiler to obtain and display an inspection certificate. A hobby or model boiler can be placed in nonoperating status upon written notification to the chief inspector. Normal inspection procedures apply when reinstating the boiler.

The inspection of every hobby or model boiler shall include an examination of or for the following:

The fusible plug, if provided in the original design.

The safety valve or valves. Such valve or valves shall be (i) marked with an American Society of Mechanical Engineers (ASME) stamp, (ii) set at or below the maximum allowable working pressure, and (iii) sealed in a manner that does not allow tampering with the valve without destroying the seal. The requirement of clause (i) shall be waived for model boilers upon the passage of an accumulation test.

Internal corrosion.

Leakage.

The boiler power piping, up to and including the first valve.

A hobby or model boiler shall be subjected to nondestructive testing, at the owner’s expense, to determine the maximum allowable working pressure in accordance with Boiler and Pressure Vessel Regulations (16 VAC 25-50-10 et seq.).

All hobby and model boilers shall pass a hydrostatic test. The pressure shall be at one and one-quarter maximum allowable working pressure, as determined by the inspection certificate and as deemed necessary based on inspections or other evidence. A hobby or model boiler that does not meet the requirements of the ASME code and is not registered in the Commonwealth shall, at the owner’s expense, be tested to one and one-half times the maximum allowable working pressure for hobby boilers and twice the maximum allowable working pressure for model boilers and, to be operated, shall have a successful (i) for lap seam and nonstandard welded boilers only, complete radiographic or ultrasonic examination of the long or longitudinal seam; (ii) ultrasonic examination for metal thickness, and for the purpose of calculating the maximum allowable working pressure, the thinnest reading shall be used; and (iii) for hobby boilers with lap seam construction, dye penetrant or magnetic particle examination for cracks with an ultrasonic or radiographic examination of areas where testing shows possible cracks.The requirements of this subsection for hobby boilers only testing to one and one-half times the maximum allowable working pressure or full radiographic or ultrasonic examination may be waived after the initial inspection if the inspector finds that the general standards of subsection B are met and the safety valve or valves are set at the maximum allowable working pressure determined by the following: calculations from the ultrasonic results or 100 pounds per square inch, whichever is lower. If a variance is requested for butt strap hobby boilers, the Commissioner shall not deny such variance request without a given, valid reason.The requirements of this subsection for model boilers only for testing to twice the maximum allowable working pressure or full radiographic or ultrasonic examination may be waived after the initial inspection if the inspector finds that the general standards of subsection B are met and the safety valve or valves are set at the maximum allowable working pressure determined by the following: calculations from the ultrasonic results or 100 pounds per square inch, whichever is lower.Any boiler which has been without a documented inspection within the past twenty years must have a two times maximum allowable working pressure hydro test prior to its operation.

Any hobby or model boiler holding a current out-of-state inspection certificate shall be accepted by the Commonwealth of Virginia, provided the inspection standards meet or exceed standards adopted by the Commonwealth.

History.

1999, c. 335; 2000, cc. 879, 898.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 879 added “if provided in the original design” at the end of subdivision B 1; in subdivision B 2, substituted “marked with an” for “rated by the” at the beginning of clause (i), and added “stamp” at the end of the clause; added the last sentence in subdivision B 2; rewrote the first paragraph of subsection D; added the second undesignated paragraph in subsection D; and inserted “model boilers only for testing to twice the maximum allowable working pressure or” in the present third paragraph in subsection D.

The 2000 amendment by c. 898 in subsection A, substituted “A hobby” for “An antique,” inserted “inclusive” in the first sentence, and added the last two sentences, substituted “hobby” for “antique” throughout the section, and added “if provided in the original design” in subdivision B 1, and in subdivision B 2, substituted “marked with an” for “rated by the” and added the last sentence, rewrote the first paragraph of subsection D, and in the second paragraph, inserted the language beginning “hobby boilers only” and ending “working pressure or” and inserted “the following,” added the last sentence, added the last two paragraphs of subsection D and added subsection E.

§ 40.1-51.19:4.
Operations and maintenance.

A hobby or model boiler must be attended by a person reasonably competent to operate such boiler when in operation. For the purposes of this section, a hobby or model boiler may be considered as not being in operation when all of the following conditions exist:

The water level is at least one-third of the water gauge glass;

The fire is banked and the draft doors closed or the fire is extinguished; and

The boiler pressure is at least twenty pounds per square inch below the lowest safety valve set pressure.

All welding performed on hobby or model boilers shall be done by an “R” stamp holder in accordance with the inspection code of the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors.

Repairs to longitudinal riveted joints are prohibited.

History.

1999, c. 335; 2000, c. 898.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 898 substituted “A hobby” for “An antique” in the first and second sentences of subsection A; deleted former subdivision A 2, and redesignated former subdivisions A 3 and A 4 as present subdivisions A 2 and A 3; and substituted “hobby” for “antique” in subsection B.

§ 40.1-51.19:4.1.
Variances.

Upon application pursuant to the provisions of subdivision 9 of §

40.1-6

, the Commissioner may allow variances from a specific statutory requirement of this article provided the applicant proves by clear and convincing evidence his hobby or model boiler meets substantially equivalent construction and operating criteria and standards.

History.

2000, cc. 879, 898.

§ 40.1-51.19:5.
Civil penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, partnership or corporation to operate in the Commonwealth a hobby or model boiler without a valid certificate. Any such person shall be subject to a civil penalty as provided by §

40.1-51.12

.

Any owner or user who leaves or causes to leave a hobby or model boiler unattended while in operation at an event to which members of the general public are invited shall be in violation of this article and subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000. Each instance of such violation shall be deemed a separate offense.

History.

1999, c. 335; 2000, c. 898.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 898 substituted “a hobby” for “an antique” in subsections A and B, and in subsection B, deleted the former first sentence which read: “Any owner or user who leaves or causes to leave an antique or model boiler unattended while in operation shall be in violation of this article and subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $100.”